Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,200
Apportionable vehicle; refund of fees; when.

Whenever an apportionable vehicle is registered by the owner under section 60-362 and the motor vehicle tax and motor vehicle fee imposed in sections 60-3,185 and 60-3,190 have been paid on that apportionable vehicle for the registration period, and then the apportionable vehicle is registered under section 60-3,198, the Division of Motor Carrier Services, upon application of the owner of the apportionable vehicle on forms prescribed by the division, shall certify that the apportionable vehicle is registered under section 60-3,198 and that the owner is entitled to receive the refunds of the unused fees for the balance of the registration period as prescribed in sections 60-395 to 60-397.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 200.